Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0371, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Contingent contract with dental administrator. (a) The commissioner shall determine the extent to which managed care and county-based purchasing plans in the aggregate meet the performance benchmark specified in subdivision 1 for coverage year 2024. If managed care and county-based purchasing plans in the aggregate fail to meet the performance benchmark, the commissioner, after issuing a request for information followed by a request for proposals, shall contract with a dental administrator to administer dental services beginning January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2030new text end , for all recipients of medical assistance and MinnesotaCare, including persons served under fee-for-service and persons receiving services through managed care and county-based purchasing plans. (b) The dental administrator must provide administrative services, including but not limited to: (1) provider recruitment, contracting, and assistance; (2) recipient outreach and assistance; (3) utilization management and reviews of medical necessity for dental services; (4) dental claims processing; (5) coordination of dental care with other services; (6) management of fraud and abuse; (7) monitoring access to dental services; (8) performance measurement; (9) quality improvement and evaluation; and (10) management of third-party liability requirements. deleted text begin (c) Dental administrator payments to contracted dental providers must be at the rates established under sections 256B.76 and 256L.11. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Recipients must be given a choice of dental provider, including any provider who agrees to provider participation requirements and payment rates established by the commissioner and dental administrator. The dental administrator must comply with the network adequacy and geographic access requirements that apply to managed care and county-based purchasing plans for dental services under section 62K.14. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The contract with the dental administrator must include a provision that states that if the dental administrator fails to meet, by calendar year deleted text begin 2029deleted text end new text begin 2032new text end , a performance benchmark under which at least 55 percent of children and adults who were continuously enrolled for at least 11 months in either medical assistance or MinnesotaCare received at least one dental visit during the calendar year, the contract must be terminated and the commissioner must enter into a contract with a new dental administrator as soon as practicable. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The commissioner shall implement this subdivision deleted text begin in consultation with representatives of providers who provide dental services to patients enrolled in medical assistance or MinnesotaCare, including but not limited to providers serving primarily low-income and socioeconomically complex populations, and with representatives of managed care plans and county-based purchasing plansdeleted text end new text begin based on the recommendations of the critical access dental provider task force established by the commissioner to identify the impacts of a contract with a single dental administrator, as allowed within existing appropriationsnew text end . Sec. 2. new text begin CRITICAL ACCESS DENTAL PROVIDER TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purpose of this subdivision, "critical access dental providers" means critical access dental providers as described in Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.76, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Task force established. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish a task force to identify the impacts of a contract with a single dental administrator under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0371, subdivision 3, on: new text end new text begin (1) financial viability of critical access dental providers; and new text end new text begin (2) access to care for medical assistance and MinnesotaCare enrollees served by critical access dental providers. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Required assessments. new text end new text begin In the performance of its responsibilities under subdivision 2, the task force must consider the following: new text end new text begin (1) the financial impact on reimbursement for critical access dental providers, including fee-based revenue, between payments by managed care and county-based purchasing plans and the rates established under Minnesota Statutes, sections 256B.76 and 256L.11; new text end new text begin (2) the potential impact on supplemental funding opportunities, both public and private, used by critical access dental providers to cover current operating costs; new text end new text begin (3) the potential impact on supplemental funding opportunities, both public and private, used by critical access dental providers for capital and service expansion costs, including physical plant development and equipment acquisition, and workforce development and training; and new text end new text begin (4) the potential harmful impacts on patients of critical access dental providers resulting from disruption of current integrated care coordination between medical, behavioral, dental, and other service providers. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Application of other law. new text end new text begin The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059 relating to member terms, compensation, and removal govern the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The task force consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of human services or a designee appointed by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (2) two members of the house of representatives, one appointed by the speaker of the house and one appointed by the house minority leader; new text end new text begin (3) two members of the senate, one appointed by the president of the senate and one appointed by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (4) a representative of the Minnesota Dental Association, appointed by the Minnesota Dental Association; new text end new text begin (5) a representative of the Association of Critical Access Dental Providers of Minnesota, appointed by the Association of Critical Access Dental Providers of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (6) a representative of nonprofit dental clinics providing services within the seven-county metropolitan area, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (7) a representative of nonprofit dental clinics providing services outside of the seven-county metropolitan area, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (8) a representative of private dental clinics for which medical assistance and MinnesotaCare enrollees comprise more than 25 percent of the clinic's patient load, appointed by the governor; and new text end new text begin (9) a representative of the Minnesota Rural Health Association, appointed by the Minnesota Rural Health Association. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin The task force must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance by January 15, 2027. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an evaluation of patient access to dental care and any proposed measures to prevent service gaps; new text end new text begin (2) a detailed financial impact analysis on reimbursements for critical access dental providers; new text end new text begin (3) recommendations to mitigate funding disruptions for operational and capital expenses; new text end new text begin (4) potential impacts of a contract with a single dental administrator under subdivision 3; and new text end new text begin (5) recommendations to the legislature to prevent harm to the financial viability of critical access dental providers and to maintain or increase access to care for enrollees in the medical assistance and MinnesotaCare programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires on ...... new text end